Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 6. Salvage Title

§ 2091.
Salvage certificates of title; forwarding of plates and titles of crushed vehicles.

Except for vehicles for which no certificate of title is required pursuant to section 2012 of this title and for vehicles that are more than 15 years old, any person who purchases or in any manner acquires a vehicle as salvage; any person who scraps, dismantles, or destroys a motor vehicle; or any insurance company or representative thereof who declares a motor vehicle to be a total loss, shall apply to the Commissioner for a salvage certificate of title within 15 days of the time the vehicle is purchased or otherwise acquired as salvage; is scrapped, dismantled, or destroyed; or is declared a total loss. However, an insurance company or representative thereof proceeding under subsection (c) of this section may apply outside this 15-day window to the extent necessary to comply with the requirements of that subsection.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the application shall be accompanied by:

any certificate of title; and

any other information or documents that the Commissioner may reasonably require to establish ownership of the vehicle and the existence or nonexistence of any security interest in the vehicle.

An insurer required to obtain a salvage certificate of title under this section for a vehicle declared a total loss, or a representative of the insurer, may obtain the title without satisfying the requirements of subsection (b) of this section if the application for the salvage certificate of title is accompanied by:
(c) (1) An insurer required to obtain a salvage certificate of title under this section for a vehicle declared a total loss, or a representative of the insurer, may obtain the title without satisfying the requirements of subsection (b) of this section if the application for the salvage certificate of title is accompanied by:

the required fee;

evidence that the insurer has made payment for the total loss of the vehicle, and evidence that the payment was made to any lienholder identified in the records of certificates of title of the Department and to the vehicle owner, if applicable; and

a copy of the insurer’s written request for the certificate of title sent at least 30 days prior to the application to the vehicle owner and to any lienholder identified in the records of certificates of title of the Department, proof that the request was sent by certified mail or was delivered by a courier service that provides proof of delivery, and copies of any responses from the vehicle owner or lienholder.

If the Commissioner issues a salvage certificate of title to an eligible person under this subsection, the title shall be issued free and clear of all liens.

Except for vehicles for which no certificate of title is required under this chapter, when a vehicle is destroyed by crushing for scrap, the person causing the destruction shall immediately mail or deliver to the Commissioner the certificate of title endorsed “crushed” and signed by the person, accompanied by the original plate showing the original vehicle identification number. The plate shall not be removed until such time as the vehicle is crushed.

This section shall not apply to, and salvage certificates of title shall not be required for, unrecovered stolen vehicles or vehicles stolen and recovered in an undamaged condition, provided that the original vehicle identification number plate has not been removed, altered, or destroyed and the number thereon is identical with that on the original title certificate.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 60

, § 10; amended

1983, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 19

, § 6;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 76.

§ 2092.
Issuance of salvage title.

The Commissioner shall file and maintain in the manner provided in section 2017 of this title each application received and when satisfied as to its genuineness and regularity and that the applicant is entitled to the issuance of a salvage certificate of title, shall issue a salvage certificate of title to the vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 60

, § 10; amended

1983, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 2093.
Salvaged, totaled, and rebuilt vehicles.

If a vehicle upon which a salvage certificate of title, a parts-only certificate, or other document indicating the vehicle is not sold for re-registration purposes has been or should have been issued by the Commissioner or by any other jurisdiction or person, or a vehicle that has been declared a totaled motor vehicle is rebuilt and restored for highway operation, the owner thereof shall not apply for a certificate of title or registration, and none shall be issued until the vehicle has been inspected by the Commissioner or his or her authorized representative. The inspection of the vehicle shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Commissioner and shall include verification of the vehicle identification number and bills of sale or titles for major component parts used to rebuild the vehicle. When necessary, a new vehicle identification number shall be attached to the vehicle as provided by section 2003 of this title. Any new title issued for such vehicles shall contain the legend “rebuilt.”

Any person who sells, trades, or offers for sale or trade any interest in a salvaged, salvaged and rebuilt, or totaled vehicle shall disclose the fact that the vehicle has been salvaged, salvaged and rebuilt, or totaled to a prospective purchaser both orally and in writing before a sale, trade, or transfer is made. Written disclosure that the vehicle has been salvaged, salvaged and rebuilt, or totaled, in addition to being disclosed on the certificate of title as required by this subchapter, shall also be conspicuously disclosed on any bill of sale, transfer, purchase, or other agreement.

Failure of the seller to provide the notices required by this section shall result in the seller being required, at the option of the buyer, to refund to the buyer the purchase price, including taxes, license fees, and similar governmental charges.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 60

, § 10; amended

1987, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2015, No. 50

, § 19.

§ 2094.
Records; inspection.

Each person who purchases or in any manner acquires a motor vehicle as salvage shall keep and maintain for a period of not less than five years such records as may be prescribed by the Commissioner which are reasonably necessary to substantiate the information contained in the application required by sections 2091 and 2093 of this title. These records shall include parts and accessories obtained and used for the repair or rebuilding, or both, of a vehicle, and such financial records that will allow the Commissioner to determine if the person qualifies to become or remain licensed as a “salvage dealer.”

The Commissioner or his or her agents may inspect and examine the books, records, premises, and vehicles on the premises of any salvage dealer during the usual business hours of the day to verify the truth and accuracy of any information furnished in connection with the provisions of this subchapter.

Any salvage dealer who in any manner receives a motor vehicle which does not have a plate attached to said vehicle bearing the vehicle identification number shall notify the Commissioner in writing that such a vehicle has been received within seven days.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 60

, § 10; amended

1991, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 2095.
Penalty.

A person who violates any provision of section 2094 of this subchapter shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned not more than six months, or both.

A person who violates any provision of this subchapter other than section 2094 shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 60

, § 10; amended

1991, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.